Utah statutes.
34A-1-307.   Action permitted in adjudicative proceedings.

For the purposes mentioned in this title, the commission may take any action permitted:

(1)  if a formal adjudicative proceeding, under Section 63G-4-205 or 63G-4-206; or

(2)  if an informal adjudicative proceeding, under Section 63G-4-203.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

